pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria kuchenne: Frytkownice beztłuszczowe; Podgrzewacze do napojów; Maszynki do chleba; Maszynki do temperingu czekolady; Ekspresy do kawy i espresso; Płyty grzewcze; Maszynki do waty cukrowej; Frytownice; Krajalnice do mięs; Zmywarki; Płyty i grille elektryczne; Czajniki elektryczne; Rondle i woki elektryczne; Zestawy do fondue; Parowary i garnki do gotowania na parze; Suszarki do żywności; Rozdrabniacze i młynki do żywności; Miksery i blendery; Roboty kuchenne; Wędzarnie; Podgrzewacze do żywności; Zamrażarki; Maszyny do produkcji lodów; Usuwanie odpadów; Płyty gazowe; Urządzenia do napojów gorących; Maszynki do lodów; Kruszarki i strugarki do lodu; Maszynki do lodu; Wyciskarki soków; Ostrzałki do noży; Mikrofalówki; Spieniacze do mleka; Maszynki do mochi; Grille na zewnątrz; Piekarniki; Maszynki do makaronu; Maszynki do popcornu; Kuchenki przenośne; Okapy kuchenne; Kuchenki; Lodówki; Piekarniki i rożna do drobiu; Syfony do napojów; Maszynki do mleka sojowego; Automaty do herbaty; Tostery i grille; Zgniatarki do śmieci; Pakowarki próżniowe; Schładzacze do wody; Filtry do wody; Lodówki do wina; Maszynki do jogurtu
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchengeräte: Heißluftfritteusen; Getränkewärmer; Brotbackautomaten; Temperiermaschinen für Schokolade; Kaffee- & Espressomaschinen; Kochfelder; Zuckerwattemaschinen; Fritteusen; Aufschnittmaschine; Geschirrspüler; Elektrogrills & -bratplatten; Wasserkocher; Elektrische Pfannen & Woks; Fonduetöpfe & -Sets; Kochtöpfe & Dampfkochtöpfe; Dörrautomaten; Lebensmittelmühlen; Mixer & Pürierstäbe; Küchenmaschinen; Lebensmittel-Räucheröfen; Speisewärmer; Gefrierschränke & -truhen; Slush-Eis-Maschinen; Abfallzerkleinerer; Gasgrillplatten; Heißgetränkebereiter; Speiseeismaschinen; Eis-Crusher & Eis-Shaver; Eismaschinen; Entsafter; Messerschärfer; Mikrowellenherde; Milchaufschäumer; Mochi-Maschinen; Außengrills; Backöfen; Nudelmaschinen; Popcornmaschinen; Campingkocher; Abzugshauben; Küchenherde; Kühlschränke; Grillöfen & Mini-Backöfen; Wassersprudler; Sojamilchbereiter; Teekocher; Toaster & Grills; Müllpressen; Vakuumierer; Trinkwasserspender; Wasserfilter; Weinkühlschränke; Joghurtmaschinen
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Συσκευές κουζίνας: Φριτέζες αέρα; Θερμαντήρες ποτών; Αρτοπαρασκευαστές; Μηχανές για στρώσιμο σοκολάτας; Καφετιέρες & μηχανές εσπρέσο; Εστίες κουζίνας; Μηχανές για μαλλί γριάς; Φριτέζες; Κοφτές αλλαντικών; Πλυντήρια πιάτων; Ηλεκτρικές σχάρες & γκριλ; Ηλεκτρικοί βραστήρες; Ηλεκτρικά τηγάνια & γουόκ; Κατσαρόλες & σετ φοντύ; Συσκευές μαγειρέματος & ατμομάγειρες; Αποξηραντές τροφίμων; Μύλοι & συσκευές άλεσης τροφίμων; Μίξερ & μπλέντερ τροφίμων; Επεξεργασίες τροφίμων; Μέσα καπνίσματος τροφίμων; Θερμαντήρες τροφίμων; Καταψύκτες; Γρανιτομηχανές; Τεμαχιστές απορριμμάτων; Ψηστιέρες αερίου; Συσκευές για ζεστά ροφήματα; Παγωτομηχανές; Θραυστήρες & τεμαχιστές πάγου; Παγομηχανές; Αποχυμωτές; Ακονιστήρια μαχαιριών; Φούρνοι μικροκυμάτων; Αναδευτήρες & παρασκευαστήρες ατμού για αφρό γάλακτος; Μηχανές παρασκευής Mochi; Εξωτερικές ψησταριές; Φούρνοι; Μηχανές ζυμαρικών; Μηχανές ποπ κορν; Φορητές εστίες μαγειρέματος; Απορροφητήρες; Eστίες μαγειρέματος; Ψυγεία; Φούρνοι & ψηστιέρες; Συσκευές παρασκευής αναψυκτικών; Συσκευές για γάλα σόγιας; Συσκευές για την παρασκευή τσαγιού; Φρυγανιέρες & γκριλ; Συμπιεστές απορριμμάτων; Συσκευές σφράγισης εν κενώ; Ψύκτες νερού; Φίλτρα νερού; Ψυγεία κρασιού; Συσκευές παρασκευής γιαουρτιού
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Eletrodomésticos de cozinha: Fritadeiras de ar; Aquecedores de bebidas; Máquinas de pão; Máquinas para temperar chocolate; Máquinas de café e expresso; Placas de fogão; Máquinas de algodão doce; Fritadeiras; Máquinas de fatiar; Máquinas de lavar louça; Grelhas e grelhadores elétricos; Chaleiras elétricas; Frigideiras e woks elétricos; Panelas e conjunto de fondue; Panelas elétricas e a vapor; Desidratadores de alimentos; Picadores e trituradores de alimentos; Misturadoras e liquidificadoras; Processadores de alimentos; Defumador de alimentos; Aquecedores de alimentos; Congeladores; Máquinas de granizados; Trituradores de lixo; Grelhadores a gás; Máquinas de bebidas quentes; Máquinas de fazer gelados; Picadores e trituradores de gelo; Máquinas de gelo; Máquinas de sumo; Afiadores de facas; Fornos micro-ondas; Espumadores e vaporizadores de leite; Máquinas para mochi; Grelhadores de exterior; Fornos; Máquinas para pasta; Máquinas de pipocas; Fogões portáteis; Exaustores; Fogões; Frigoríficos; Fornos para assar e fornos com espeto rotativo; Máquinas de gaseificação; Máquinas de leite de soja; Jarros elétricos para chá; Torradeiras e grelhadores; Compactadores de lixo; Seladores a vácuo; Arrefecedores de água; Filtros de água; Frigoríficos de vinho; Iogurteiras
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliances: Air Fryers; Beverage Warmers; Breadmakers; Chocolate Tempering Machines; Coffee Makers & Espresso Machines; Cooktops; Cotton Candy Machines; Deep Fryers; Deli Slicers; Dishwashers; Electric Griddles & Grills; Electric Kettles; Electric Skillets & Woks; Fondue Pots & Sets; Food Cookers & Steamers; Food Dehydrators; Food Grinders & Mills; Food Mixers & Blenders; Food Processors; Food Smokers; Food Warmers; Freezers; Frozen Drink Makers; Garbage Disposals; Gas Griddles; Hot Drink Makers; Ice Cream Makers; Ice Crushers & Shavers; Ice Makers; Juicers; Knife Sharpeners; Microwave Ovens; Milk Frothers & Steamers; Mochi Makers; Outdoor Grills; Ovens; Pasta Makers; Popcorn Makers; Portable Cooking Stoves; Range Hoods; Ranges; Refrigerators; Roaster Ovens & Rotisseries; Soda Makers; Soy Milk Makers; Tea Makers; Toasters & Grills; Trash Compactors; Vacuum Sealers; Water Coolers; Water Filters; Wine Fridges; Yogurt Makers
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器: 氣炸鍋; 飲料加熱器; 製麵包機; 巧克力調溫機器; 咖啡機/義式咖啡機; 爐具; 棉花糖機; 油炸機; 切肉機; 洗碗機; 電烤盤/電烤架; 電水壺; 電煎鍋/電炒鍋; 巧克力鍋具/組; 料理鍋/蒸鍋; 食物乾燥劑; 食物研磨機; 食物攪拌器; 食品加工機; 煙燻機; 食物保溫設備; 冷凍庫; 雪泥機; 家用廚餘處理機; 瓦斯烤架; 熱飲製造機; 冰淇淋機; 碎冰機和刨冰機; 製冰機; 榨汁機; 磨刀器; 微波爐; 奶泡機; 麻糬機; 戶外烤架; 烤爐; 義大利麵機; 爆米花機; 戶外爐; 抽油煙機; 各式爐具; 冰箱; 旋風烤箱/燒烤爐; 氣泡水製造機; 豆漿機; 泡茶機; 烤麵包機和煎烤盤; 垃圾壓縮機; 真空封口機; 直立式飲水機; 濾水器; 冷藏酒櫃; 優格機
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องใช้ในครัว: เครื่องทอดด้วยลมร้อน; ที่อุ่นเครื่องดื่ม; เครื่องทำขนมปัง; เครื่องละลายช็อกโกเลต; เครื่องทำกาแฟและเครื่องชงเอสเปรสโซ่; เตาปรุงอาหาร; เครื่องทำขนมสายไหม; เครื่องทอดน้ำมันท่วม; เครื่องหั่นสไลด์เนื้อสัตว์; เครื่องล้างจาน; เตาปิ้งย่างไฟฟ้า; กาน้ำไฟฟ้า; กระทะไฟฟ้า; หม้อและชุดของฟองดู; หม้อหุงและหม้อนึ่ง; เครื่องอบแห้งสำหรับอาหาร; เครื่องบดและเครื่องโม่อาหาร; เครื่องผสมและเครื่องปั่นอาหาร; เครื่องเตรียมอาหาร; เตารมควันอาหาร; เครื่องอุ่นอาหาร; เครื่องแช่แข็ง; เครื่องทำเครื่องดื่มแช่แข็ง; อุปกรณ์กำจัดเศษอาหาร; เตาย่างแก๊ส; เครื่องทำเครื่องดื่มร้อน; เครื่องทำไอศกรีม; เครื่องบดและไสน้ำแข็ง; เครื่องทำน้ำแข็ง; เครื่องคั้นน้ำ; ที่ลับมีด; เตาไมโครเวฟ; ที่ทำฟองนมและอุ่นนม; เครื่องทำโมจิ; เตาปิ้งย่างกลางแจ้ง; เตาอบ; เครื่องทำพาสต้า; เครื่องทำป็อปคอร์น; เตาทำอาหารแบบพกพา; เครื่องดูดควัน; เตาแก๊ส; ตู้เย็น; เตาปิ้งย่างและเตาอบแบบหมุน; เครื่องทำน้ำอัดลม; เครื่องทำนมถั่วเหลือง; เครื่องชงชา; เครื่องปิ้งและเครื่องย่าง; เครื่องอัดขยะ; เครื่องผนึกสุญญากาศ; คูลเลอร์น้ำ; เครื่องกรองน้ำ; ตู้แช่ไวน์; เครื่องทำโยเกิร์ต
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenapparater: Airfryer; Drikkevarmere; Brødmaskiner; Sjokoladevarmeapparater; Kaffe- og espressomaskiner; Koketopper; Sukkerspinnmaskiner; Frityrapparater; Påleggskuttere; Oppvaskmaskiner; Elektriske griller; Elektriske vannkokere; Elektriske panner og woker; Fonduegryter og -sett; Matkokere og -dampere; Matdehydratorer; Matkverner; Kjøkkenmaskiner og miksere; Kjøkkenmaskiner; Matrøykere; Matvarmere; Frysere; Maskiner for frossen drikke; Søppeltømming; Gassgriller; Maskiner for varm drikke; Iskremmaskiner; Isknusere og -høvler; Ismaskiner; Juicemaskiner; Knivslipere; Mikrobølgeovner; Melkeskummere og -steamere; Mochimaskiner; Utegriller; Ovner; Pastamaskiner; Popcornmaskiner; Bærbare kokeapparater; Avtrekkshetter; Avtrekk; Kjøleskap; Stekeovner og rotisserier; Brusmaskiner; Soyamelkmaskiner; Temaskiner; Brødristere og griller; Søppelkomprimerere; Vakuumforseglere; Vannkjølere; Vannfiltre; Vinskap; Yoghurtmaskiner
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器: 空气炸锅; 饮料保温器; 面包机; 巧克力调温机; 咖啡机/浓缩咖啡机; 炉灶; 棉花糖机; 油炸机; 切肉片机; 洗碗机; 电烤盘/电烤炉; 电水壶; 电煎锅及电炒锅; 奶酪火锅; 食物烹调用具; 食品脱水器; 食品粉碎机/搅拌机; 食品搅拌器; 食物处理机; 烟熏炉; 食物保温台; 冷柜; 冷饮机; 厨余粉碎机; 燃气扒炉; 各类热饮机; 冰淇淋机; 碎冰机/刨冰机; 制冰机; 榨汁机; 磨刀器; 微波炉; 奶泡机/发泡机; 年糕机; 户外烧烤架; 烤箱; 面条机; 爆米花机; 便携式烹饪炉; 抽油烟机; 集成灶; 冰箱; 烤箱/烤炉; 汽水机; 豆奶机; 沏茶器; 烤面包机与烤肉架; 垃圾压缩机; 真空封口机; 冷热饮水机; 滤水器/净水器; 电子酒柜; 酸奶机
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski aparati: Zračne friteze; Grijači za piće; Pekači kruha; Uređaji za temperiranje čokolade; Aparati za kavu i espresso aparati; Ploče za kuhanje; Aparati za šećernu vunu; Friteze; Mesoreznice; Perilice posuđa; Električni roštilji i kontaktni roštilji; Električna kuhala; Električne tave i wokovi; Zdjelice i setovi za fondue; Kuhala i parna kuhala za hranu; Dehidratori za hranu; Mlinci i mlinovi za hranu; Mikseri i blenderi za hranu; Prerađivači hrane; Dimnici za hranu; Grijalice za hranu; Zamrzivači; Aparati za smrznuta pića; Drobilice smeća; Plinski roštilji; Aparati za vruća pića; Aparati za sladoled; Drobilice i strugači za led; Ledomati; Sokovnici; Oštrila za noževe; Mikrovalne pećnice; Pjenilice i grijači mlijeka; Mochi aparati; Vanjski roštilji; Pećnice; Aparati za tjesteninu; Aparati za kokice; Prijenosni štednjaci; Kuhinjske nape; Štednjaci; Hladnjaci; Pećnice i ražnjevi; Aparati za gaziranje; Aparati za sojino mlijeko; Aparati za čaj; Tosteri i roštilji; Uređaji za drobljenje smeća; Vakuumski zatvarači; Uređaji za hlađenje vode; Filtri za vodu; Hladnjaci za vino; Aparati za jogurt
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai gépek: Air Fryerek; Italmelegítők; Kenyérsütők; Csokoládétemperáló gépek; Kávéfőzők és eszpresszógépek; Főzőlapok; Vattacukorgépek; Fritőzök; Hússzeletelők; Mosogatógépek; Elektromos rácsok és grillek; Elektromos vízforralók; Elektromos tepsik és wokok; Fondue-edények és -készletek; Ételfőzők és -párolók; Élelmiszer-szárítók; Élelmiszer-darálók és -passzírozók; Ételmixerek és -turmixok; Konyhai robotgépek; Ételfüstölők; Ételmelegítők; Fagyasztók; Fagyasztottital-készítők; Szemétgyűjtők; Gázrácsok; Forróital-készítők; Fagylaltkészítők; Jégzúzók és -darálók; Jégkészítők; Gyümölcsfacsarók; Késélezők; Mikrohullámú sütők; Tejhabosítók és -gőzölők; Mochi készítők; Kültéri grillek; Sütők; Tésztakészítők; Popcorn-készítők; Hordozható tűzhelyek; Páraelszívók; Elszívók; Hűtőszekrények; Sütőkemencék és forgógrillek; Szódakészítők; Szójatejkészítők; Teafőzők; Kenyérpirítók és grillsütők; Szemetestömörítők; Vákuumcsomagolók; Vízhűtők; Vízszűrők; Borhűtők; Joghurtkészítők
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče: Horkovzdušné fritézy; Ohřívače nápojů; Domácí pekárny; Přístroje na temperování čokolády; Kávovary a automaty na espreso; Vařiče; Stroje na cukrovou vatu; Fritézy; Elektrické kráječe; Myčky nádobí; Elektrické pánve a grily; Rychlovarné konvice; Remosky; Sady na fondue; Hrnce na vaření a parní hrnce; Sušičky potravin; Mlýnky; Mixéry a šlehače; Kuchyňské roboty; Udírny; Ohřívače jídla; Mrazničky; Výrobníky ledové tříště, mražených krémů a chlazených nápojů; Drtiče odpadu; Plynové plotny; Přístroje na přípravu teplých nápojů; Zmrzlinovače; Drtiče ledu; Ledovače; Odšťavňovače; Ostřiče nožů; Mikrovlnné trouby; Automatické a parní pěniče mléka; Strojky na moči; Zahradní grily; Trouby; Mlýnky na těstoviny; Stroje na výrobu popcornu; Kempinkové trouby; Digestoře; Sporáky; Chladničky; Pečicí trouby a grily; Sodovkovače; Přístroje na výrobu sojového mléka; Čajovary; Topinkovače a grily; Lisy na odpad; Přístroje na vakuové balení potravin; Chladiče vody; Vodní filtry; Chladničky na víno; Jogurtovače
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски уреди: Фритюрници с горещ въздух; Нагреватели за напитки; Хлебопекарни; Машини за темпериране на шоколад; Кафемашини и машини за еспресо; Готварски плотове; Машини за захарен памук; Фритюрници; Машини за рязане на колбаси; Съдомиялни машини; Електрически плочи и скари; Електрически кани; Електрически тигани и уок тигани; Тенджери и комплекти за фондю; Уреди за готвене и пара; Дехидратори за храна; Мелачки и мелници за храна; Миксери и блендери за храна; Кухненски роботи; Уреди за опушване на храна; Нагреватели за храна; Фризери; Уреди за замразени напитки; Кухненски мелачки за отпадъци; Газови скари; Уреди за топли напитки; Машини за сладолед; Ледотрошачки и машини за скреж; Ледогенератори; Сокоизстисквачки; Точила за ножове; Микровълнови фурни; Уреди за разпенване на мляко; Машини за мочи; Външни грилове; Фурни; Машини за паста; Машини за пуканки; Преносими готварски печки; Аспиратори; Печки; Хладилници; Фурни за печене и грилове; Машини за газиране; Машини за соево мляко; Уреди за чай; Тостери и грилове; Компактори за отпадъци; Вакуумни уплътнители; Охладители за вода; Филтри за вода; Хладилници за вино; Уреди за приготвяне на кисело мляко
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjski aparati: Cvrtniki na vroč zrak; Grelniki pijač; Pekači kruha; Stroji za temperiranje čokolade; Aparati za kavo in aparati za espresso; Kuhalne plošče; Aparati za pripravo sladkorne vate; Cvrtniki; Salamoreznice; Pomivalni stroji; Električne rešetke in žari; Električni kuhalniki; Električne žar ponve in voki; Lonci in kompleti za fondi; Kuhalniki in soparniki hrane; Dehidratorji hrane; Aparati in mlinčki za mletje hrane; Mešalniki in blenderji za hrano; Kuhinjski roboti; Aparati za dimljenje živil; Grelci za hrano; Zamrzovalniki; Aparati za zamrznjene pijače; Posode za smeti; Plinske rešetke; Aparati za tople pijače; Aparati za izdelavo sladoleda; Drobilci in brivniki za led; Aparati za led; Sokovniki; Brusilniki za nože; Mikrovalovne pečice; Penilci in soparniki mleka; Naprave za pripravo močija; Zunanji žari; Pečice; Strojčki za testenine; Aparati za pokovko; Prenosne kuhalne plošče; Kuhinjske nape; Štedilniki; Hladilniki; Električne ponve in vrtljivi ražnji; Aparati za gaziranje; Aparati za pripravo rastlinskega mleka; Aparati za čaj; Opekači kruha in žari; Stiskalnice za odpadke; Aparati za vakuumiranje; Hladilniki vode; Filtri za vodo; Vinski hladilniki; Aparati za pripravo jogurta
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Electrocasnice de bucătărie: Friteuze pentru prăjire cu aer cald; Încălzitoare pentru băuturi; Mașini de pâine; Mașini pentru temperarea ciocolatei; Cafetiere și espressoare; Plite de gătit; Mașini de vată de zahăr; Friteuze; Aparate de feliat pentru mezeluri; Mașini de spălat vase; Plite și grătare electrice; Fierbătoare electrice; Cratițe și tigăi wok electrice; Oale și seturi fondue; Aparate de gătit și aparate de preparat alimente la aburi; Aparate de deshidratare a alimentelor; Mașini de tocat și râșnițe pentru alimente; Mixere și blendere pentru alimente; Roboți de bucătărie; Afumători pentru alimente; Aparate pentru menținerea alimentelor calde; Congelatoare; Aparate pentru prepararea băuturilor cu gheață; Tocătoare de resturi alimentare; Plite cu gaz; Aparate pentru prepararea băuturilor calde; Mașini de înghețată; Mașini de zdrobit și mărunțit gheață; Mașini pentru gheață; Storcătoare; Ascuțitori de cuțite; Cuptoare cu microunde; Aparate de spumare lapte; Aparate pentru preparat mochi; Grătare în aer liber; Cuptoare; Aparate pentru preparat paste; Mașini de popcorn; Aragazuri portabile; Hote; Aragazuri; Frigidere; Cuptoare și dispozitive rotiserie; Aparate pentru preparat băuturi carbogazificate; Aparate pentru preparat lapte de soia; Aparate pentru preparat ceai; Prăjitoare de pâine și grătare; Compactoare pentru gunoi; Aparate de vidare; Răcitoare de apă; Filtre de apă; Frigidere pentru vinuri; Aparate pentru iaurt
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Elettrodomestici: Friggitrici ad aria; Scaldabevande; Macchine per fare il pane; Macchine temperatrici cioccolato; Macchine caffè ed espresso; Piani cottura; Macchine zucchero filato; Friggitrici; Affettatrici per alimenti; Lavastoviglie; Piastre a griglie elettriche; Bollitori elettrici; Padelle e wok elettrici; Set e pentole per fonduta; Cuocitori e dispositivi di cottura al vapore per cibi; Essiccatori cibi; Tritatutto e passaverdure; Mixer e frullatori; Robot da cucina; Affumicatoi; Scaldavivande; Congelatori; Macchine per granite; Tritarifiuti; Piastre a gas; Macchine per bevande calde; Macchine per il gelato; Tritaghiaccio; Macchine produzione ghiaccio; Spremitori; Affilatrici coltelli; Forni a microonde; Schiumatori e steamer per latte; Macchine per mochi; Griglie per esterni; Forni; Macchine pasta; Macchine popcorn; Fornellini da campeggio; Cappe da cucina; Fornelli; Frigoriferi; Tegami arrosto/girarrosto; Soda maker; Macchine per fare latte di soia; Bollitori per il tè; Tostapane e griglie; Compattatori rifiuti; Sigillatori sotto vuoto; Erogatori d'acqua; Filtri acqua; Refrigeratori per vini; Macchine yogurt
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenudstyr: Airfryere; Varmeplader til drikkevarer; Brødmaskiner; Chokoladesmeltere; Kaffemaskiner og espressomaskiner; Kogeplader; Candyflossmaskiner; Frituregryder; Pålægsmaskine; Opvaskemaskiner; Elektriske stege- og grillplader; Elkedler; Elektriske pander og wokke; Fonduesæt; Kogeapparater og dampere; Tørreovne til mad; Madkværne og -møller; Køkkenmaskiner og blendere; Foodprocessorer; Røgeovne; Varmeplader til mad; Frysere; Slushicemaskiner; Affaldskværne; Gasbageplader; Apparat til varme drikke; Ismaskiner; Isknusere og iskværne; Isterningmaskiner; Saftpressere; Knivskærpere; Mikrobølgeovne; Mælkeskummere; Riskagemaskiner; Udendørsgrill; Ovne; Pastamaskiner; Popcornmaskiner; Kogeblus; Emhætter; Komfurer; Køleskabe; Stegeovne og rotisserier; Sodavandsmaskiner; Sojamælkmaskiner; Temaskiner; Brødristere og bordgriller; Skraldkomprimering; Vakuumforseglere; Vandkølere; Vandfiltre; Vinkøleskabe; Yoghurtmaskiner
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電: エアフライヤー; ドリンクウォーマー; ホームベーカリー; チョコレートテンパリングマシン; コーヒーメーカー・エスプレッソマシン; コンロ; 綿菓子メーカー; フライヤー; ハム・チーズスライサー; 食器洗浄機; 電気グリドル・電気グリル; 電気ポット・電気ケトル; 電気グリルパン; フォンデュ鍋・フォンデュセット; 炊飯器・蒸し器; 食品乾燥機; フードミル; フードミキサー・フードプロセッサー; フードプロセッサー; 燻製器; 食品保温器; フリーザー; フローズンドリンクメーカー; ディスポーザー; ガスグリドル; ホットドリンクメーカー; アイスクリームメーカー; かき氷器; 製氷機; ジューサー; 包丁研ぎ器; 電子レンジ; ミルクフォーマー・スチーマー; 餅つき機; バーベキューグリル; オーブン; パスタメーカー; ポップコーンメーカー; 携帯用コンロ; レンジフード; レンジ; 冷蔵庫; ロースター; ソーダメーカー; 豆乳メーカー; ティーメーカー; トースター・グリル; ゴミ圧縮機; 真空パック器; ウォータークーラー; 浄水器; ワインセラー; ヨーグルトメーカー
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukenapparatuur: Airfryers; Drankenwarmers; Broodmachines; Tempereermachines voor chocolade; Koffiezetapparaten en espressomachines; Kookplaten; Suikerspinmachines; Frituurpannen; Vleessnijders; Vaatwasmachines; Elektrische bakplaten en grills; Waterkokers; Elektrische braadpannen en wokken; Fonduesets; Kook- en stoomapparaten; Voedseldrogers; Roerzeven en hakmolens; Mixers en blenders; Keukenmachines; Voedselrookovens; Warmhoudplaten voor voedsel; Vriezers; Machines voor schaafijs; Afvalvernietigers; Grillplaten voor gas; Apparaten voor het maken van warme dranken; IJsmakers; IJscrushers en -schavers; Machines voor ijs; Fruitpersen; Messenslijpers; Magnetrons; Melkkloppers en -opschuimers; Mochimachines; Buitengrills; Ovens; Pastamakers; Popcornmakers; Kampeerkooktoestellen; Afzuigkappen; Fornuizen; Koelkasten; Grillovens en spitten; Frisdrankapparaten; Makers van sojamelk; Theezetapparaten; Broodroosters en tosti-apparaten; Afvalpersen; Vacuümapparaten; Waterkoelers; Waterfilters; Wijnkoelkasten; Yoghurtmakers
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteet: Airfryer; Juomalämmittimet; Leipäkoneet; Suklaan temperointikoneet; Kahvinkeittimet ja espressokoneet; Liedet; Hattarakoneet; Friteerauskeittimet; Siivutuskoneet; Astianpesukoneet; Sähköiset paistolevyt ja parilat; Vedenkeittimet; Sähköiset paistinpannut ja wokit; Fondue-padat ja -setit; Ruuan keittimet ja höyryttimet; Ruokakuivurit; Ruokamyllyt ja jauhatuslaitteet; Ruuan sekoittimet ja blenderit; Monitoimikoneet; Savustimet; Ruuan lämmittimet; Pakastimet; Jäähilejuomakoneet; Jäteastiat; Kaasuparilat; Kuumien juomien valmistuslaitteet; Jäätelökoneet; Jäämurskaimet ja jäähilekoneet; Jääpalakoneet; Mehustimet; Veitsenteroittimet; Mikroaaltouunit; Maidonvaahdottimet ja höyrivaahdottimet; Mochi-koneet; Ulkogrillit; Uunit; Pastakoneet; Popcorn-koneet; Siirrettävät keittolevyt; Liesituulettimet; Hellat; Jääkaapit; Paisto- ja varrasuunit; Hiilihapotuslaitteet; Soijamaitokoneet; Teenkeittimet; Leipägrillit ja grillit; Jätepuristimet; Tyhjiöpakkauslaitteet; Juomavesi­automaatit; Juomavesi­suodattimet; Viinijääkaapit; Jogurttikoneet
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전: 에어 프라이어; 음료 워머; 제빵기; 초콜릿 템퍼링 기계; 커피 메이커/에스프레소 머신; 쿡탑; 솜사탕 기계; 튀김기; 델리 슬라이서; 식기 세척기; 전기 그리들/그릴; 전기 주전자; 전기 팬/웍; 퐁듀 냄비/세트; 쿠커/찜기; 식품 건조기; 그라인더/분쇄기; 믹서/블렌더; 푸드 프로세서; 훈연기; 식품 보온기; 냉동고; 슬러시 메이커; 음식물 쓰레기 처리기; 가스 그리들; 뜨거운 음료 메이커; 아이스크림 제조기; 얼음 분쇄기/빙수기; 제빙기; 주스기; 칼갈이 도구; 전자레인지; 우유 거품기/스팀기; 모찌 제조기; 야외용 그릴; 오븐; 파스타 제조기; 팝콘 제조기; 휴대용 요리 스토브; 레인지 후드; 레인지; 냉장고; 로스트 오븐/로티세리; 탄산수 제조기; 두유 메이커; 티 메이커; 토스터/그릴; 쓰레기 압축기; 진공 포장기; 냉수기; 정수 필터; 와인 냉장고; 요거트 제조기
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Électroménager de cuisine: Friteuses à air; Chauffe tasses; Machines à pain; Tempéreuses à chocolat; Machines à café et machines à expresso; Tables de cuisson; Machines à barbe à papa; Friteuses; Trancheuses à viande; Lave-vaisselle; Grils et barbecues électriques; Bouilloires électriques; Sauteuses et woks électriques; Marmites et ensembles à fondue; Cuiseurs et cuiseurs vapeur; Déshydrateurs alimentaires; Moulins et hachoirs; Robots mixeurs et blenders; Robots culinaires; Fumoirs alimentaires; Chauffe-repas; Congélateurs; Machines à granité; Broyeurs de déchets; Planchas au gaz; Machines à boissons chaudes; Sorbetières et turbines à glace; Broyeurs et pileurs de glace; Machines à glaçons; Extracteurs de jus; Aiguiseurs de couteaux; Fours à micro-ondes; Émulsionneurs et mousseurs à lait; Machines à mochi; Grils d’extérieur; Fours; Machines à pâtes; Machines à popcorn; Réchauds portables; Hottes aspirantes; Cuisinières; Réfrigérateurs; Rôtissoires; Machines à gazéifier; Machines à lait de soja; Machines à thé; Grils électriques et grille-pains; Compacteurs de déchets ménagers; Emballages sous vide; Refroidisseurs d’eau; Filtres à eau; Caves à vin; Yaourtières
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aletleri: Airfryer; İçecek Isıtıcıları; Ekmek Yapma Makineleri; Çikolata Sertleştirme Makineleri; Kahve Makineleri ve Espresso Makineleri; Setüstü Ocaklar; Pamuk Şeker Makineleri; Fritözler; Et Dilimleyiciler; Bulaşık Makineleri; Elektrikli Tavalar ve Izgaralar; Elektrikli Su Isıtıcıları; Elektrikli Kızartma Tavaları ve Derin Tavalar; Fondü Kapları ve Setleri; Yemek Pişirme Ocakları ve Buharlı Pişiriciler; Gıda Kurutucular; Gıda Öğütücüleri ve Değirmenleri; Mikserler ve Blender'lar; Mutfak Robotları; Dumanla Pişirme Makineleri; Yiyecek Isıtıcıları; Dondurucular; Karlamaç Makineleri; Çöp Öğütücüleri; Gazlı Saçlar; Sıcak İçecek Makineleri; Dondurma Makineleri; Buz Kırıcılar ve Tıraşlayıcılar; Buz Yapıcılar; Meyve Sıkacakları; Bıçak Bileyiciler; Mikrodalga Fırınlar; Süt Köpürtücüler ve Buharlaştırıcılar; Mochi Makineleri; Bahçe Izgaraları; Fırınlar; Makarna Yapma Makineleri; Mısır Patlatma Makineleri; Portatif Fırınlı Ocak; Davlumbazlar; Mutfak Ocakları; Buzdolapları; Rosto Tencereleri ve Döner Tepsili Fırınlar; Soda Makineleri; Soya Sütü Yapma Makineleri; Çay Makineleri; Tost Makineleri ve Izgaralar; Çöp Kompaktörleri; Yiyecek Poşeti Vakumlayıcıları; Su Soğutucuları; Su Filtreleri; Şarap Soğutma Dolapları; Yoğurt Makineleri
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Electrodomésticos de cocina: Freidoras de aire; Calentadores de bebidas; Horno de pan; Máquinas para derretir chocolate; Cafeteras; Placas de cocina; Máquinas de algodón dulce; Freidoras; Cortadoras de fiambres; Lavavajillas; Planchas y parrillas eléctricas; Hervidores eléctricos; Woks y sartenes eléctricas; Juegos para fondues; Ollas de vapor para alimentos; Deshidratadores de comida; Molinos y trituradoras de comida; Batidoras y licuadoras; Procesadores de comida; Ahumadores de comida; Calentadores de comida; Congeladores; Máquinas de granizados; Trituradores de desechos; Planchas de gas; Preparadores de bebidas calientes; Heladeras; Granizadoras y picadoras de hielo; Máquinas de hielo; Exprimidores; Afiladores de cuchillos; Hornos microondas; Máquinas de hacer espuma de leche; Máquinas para hacer mochi; Barbacoas; Hornos; Máquinas para hacer pasta; Máquinas de palomitas; Cocinas de camping; Extractores; Cocinas; Frigoríficos; Asadores y hornos para asar; Máquinas para hacer leche de soja; Máquinas para leche de soja; Teteras eléctricas; Tostadores y parrillas; Trituradores de basura; Envasados al vacío; Dispensadores enfriadores de agua; Filtros de agua; Neveras para vino; Yogurteras
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisai: Karšto oro gruzdintuvės; Gėrimų šildytuvai; Duonkepės; Šokolado temperavimo aparatai; Kavos ir espreso aparatai; Kaitlentės; Cukraus vatos aparatai; Gruzdintuvės; Delikatesų pjaustyklės; Indaplovės; Elektriniai kepimo padėklai ir kepsninės; Elektriniai virduliai; Elektrinės keptuvės ir vokai; Fondiu puodai ir rinkiniai; Maisto viryklės ir troškintuvai garuose; Maisto džiovyklės; Maisto grūstuvės ir malūnėliai; Maisto maišytuvai ir trintuvai; Virtuvės kombainai; Maistas rūkyklos; Maisto šildytuvai; Šaldikliai; Šaldytų gėrimų gaminimo aparatai; Šiukšlių šalinimas; Dujinės keptuvės; Karštų gėrimų gaminimo aparatai; Ledų gaminimo aparatai; Ledo trupintuvai ir skustuvai; Ledo gaminimo aparatai; Sulčiaspaudės; Peilių galąstuvai; Mikrobangų krosnelės; Pieno plaktuvai ir garintuvai; Močių gaminimo aparatai; Lauko kepsninės; Orkaitės; Makaronų gaminimo aparatai; Spragėsių gaminimo aparatai; Nešiojamosios viryklės; Gartraukiai; Viryklės; Šaldytuvai; Minikrosnelės ir kepimo ant iešmo sistemos; Vandens gazavimo aparatai; Sojų pieno gaminimo aparatai; Arbatos virimo aparatai; Skrudintuvai ir kepsninės; Atliekų tankintuvai; Vakuuminiai sandarikliai; Vandens aušintuvai; Vandens filtrai; Vyno šaldytuvai; Jogurto gaminimo aparatai
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная техника: Аэрогрили; Подогреватели для напитков; Хлебопечки; Аппараты для темперирования шоколада; Кофеварки и кофемашины; Варочные панели; Аппараты для приготовления сладкой ваты; Фритюрницы; Ломтерезки; Посудомоечные машины; Электрогрили; Электрические чайники; Электрические сковороды и воки; Фондюшницы и наборы для фондю; Электрокастрюли и пароварки; Дегидраторы пищевых продуктов; Кухонные измельчители; Миксеры и блендеры; Кухонные комбайны; Коптильни; Устройства для подогрева блюд; Морозильные камеры; Аппараты для приготовления замороженных напитков; Измельчители пищевых отходов; Газовые грили; Аппараты для приготовления горячих напитков; Мороженицы; Измельчители и шейверы для льда; Льдогенераторы; Соковыжималки; Ножеточки; Микроволновые печи; Механические и паровые капучинаторы; Аппараты для приготовления моти; Уличные грили; Духовые шкафы; Паста-машины и лапшерезки; Аппараты для приготовления попкорна; Портативные плиты; Кухонные вытяжки; Кухонные плиты; Холодильники; Мини-печи и электрошашлычницы; Сифоны для газирования воды; Аппараты для приготовления соевого молока; Чаеварки; Тостеры и аппараты для выпекания; Прессы для мусора; Вакууматоры; Кулеры для воды; Фильтры для воды; Винные шкафы; Йогуртницы
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské spotrebiče: Teplovzdušné fritézy; Ohrievače nápojov; Pekárničky chleba; Stroje na temperovanie čokolády; Kávovary a espresso kávovary; Varné dosky; Stroje na výrobu cukrovej vaty; Fritézy; Nárezové stroje; Umývačky riadu; Elektrické grily; Rýchlovarné kanvice; Elektrické rajnice a woky; Nádoby a súpravy na fondue; Teplovzdušné fritézy; Sušičky potravín; Mlynčeky na potraviny a pasírovače; Šľahače a mixéry na potraviny; Kuchynské roboty; Zariadenia na údenie potravín; Zariadenia na ohrev jedla; Mrazničky; Výrobníky mrazených nápojov; Drviče odpadu; Plynové grily; Výrobníky horúcich nápojov; Výrobníky zmrzliny; Drviče ľadu a výrobníky ľadovej drte; Výrobníky ľadu; Odšťavovače; Brúsky na nože; Mikrovlnné rúry; Napeňovače a naparovače mlieka; Výrobníky mochi; Externé grily; Rúry; Stroje na výrobu cestovín; Výrobníky pukancov; Prenosné variče; Digestory; Sporáky; Chladničky; Grily s otočným roštom; Výrobníky sódy; Výrobníky sójového mlieka; Čajové automaty; Hriankovače a grily; Lisy odpadu; Vákuové zváračky; Chladiace boxy na vodu; Vodné filtre; Vinotéky; Jogurtovače
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksutrustning: Airfryers; Dryckvärmare; Bakmaskiner; Maskiner för chokladtemperering; Kaffebryggare och espressomaskiner; Spishällar; Maskiner för spunnet socker; Fritöser; Köttskivare; Diskmaskiner; Elektriska bordsgrillar och grillar; Vattenkokare; Elektriska stekpannor och wokar; Fondueset; Matlagningsmaskiner och ångkokare; Torkugnar; Matkvarnar; Matmixrar och blenders; Matprocessorer; Matrökare; Matuppvärmare; Frysar; Slushmaskiner; Avfallskvarnar; Gasdrivna bordsgrillar; Maskiner för varma drycker; Glassmaskiner; Iskrossar och -hyvlar; Ismaskiner; Juicepressar; Knivslipare; Mikrovågsugnar; Mjölkskummare och mjölkångare; Mockamaskiner; Utomhusgrillar; Ugnar; Pastamaskiner; Popcornmaskiner; Portabla spisar; Köksfläktar; Köksspisar; Kylskåp; Grillugnar och ugnar med roterande stekspett; Sodamaskiner; Sojamjölkmaskiner; Tebryggare; Brödrostar och brödgrillar; Avfallspressar; Vakuumförpackare; Vattenkylare; Vattenfilter; Vinkylar; Yogurtmaskiner
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Thiết bị nhà bếp: Máy chiên không dầu; Đế giữ nhiệt đồ uống; Máy làm bánh mì; Máy trộn sô-cô-la; Máy pha cà phê và máy Espresso; Bếp âm; Máy thổi kẹo bông; Bếp chiên nhúng; Máy cắt thịt nguội; Máy rửa bát; Vỉ nướng và lò nướng điện; Ấm điện; Xoong điện và chảo điện; Nồi và bộ nồi khay đựng nước sốt đun; Nồi điện và nồi hấp; Máy sấy thực phẩm; Máy xay, nghiền thực phẩm; Máy trộn và xay thực phẩm; Máy xay thực phẩm; Lò hun khói; Máy hâm nóng thức ăn; Tủ đá; Thiết bị làm đồ uống đá xay; Dụng cụ lọc rác bồn rửa chén bát; Vỉ nướng bằng gas; Thiết bị làm đồ uống nóng; Máy làm kem; Máy bào và máy nghiền đá; Máy làm đá; Máy ép hoa quả; Dụng cụ mài dao; Lò vi sóng; Máy hâm sữa & tạo váng; Máy làm mochi; Bếp nướng ngoài trời; Lò nướng; Máy làm mì ống; Máy làm bắp rang; Bếp du lịch; Máy hút mùi bếp; Bếp lò; Tủ lạnh; Lò nướng và lò quay thịt; Máy làm nước xô-đa; Máy làm sữa đậu nành; Máy pha trà; Lò nướng lửa trên và lò nướng lửa dưới; Máy ép rác; Máy hút chân không; Cây nước nóng lạnh; Thiết bị lọc nước; Tủ rượu; Máy làm sữa chua
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Utensílios para cozinha: Air fryers; Aquecedores de bebidas; Panificadoras; Máquinas para temperar chocolate; Cafeteiras e máquinas de café expresso; Fogões de mesa; Máquinas de algodão-doce; Fritadeiras fundas; Fatiadores de frios; Lava-louças; Grelhadores elétricos; Chaleiras elétricas; Panelas quadradas e woks elétricos; Conjuntos para fondue; Panelas e panelas de pressão; Desidratador de alimentos; Moedores e amassadores de alimentos; Mixers e liquidificadores de comida; Processadores de alimentos; Defumadores; Aquecedores de alimento; Congeladores; Máquinas de fazer raspadinha; Trituradores de lixo; Grelhas a gás; Máquinas de bebidas quentes; Sorveteiras; Máquinas de gelo; Máquinas de fazer gelo; Espremedores; Afiadores de faca; Micro-ondas; Batedores e aquecedores de leite; Máquina de bolinhos de arroz japoneses (moti); Churrasqueiras externas; Fornos; Máquinas de massa; Pipoqueiras; Fogões para camping; Tampas para fogão; Fogões; Geladeiras; Fornos com grelhas e churrasqueiras; Máquinas de fazer refrigerante; Máquinas para fazer leite de soja; Bules; Torradeiras e grelhas; Compactadores de lixo; Seladoras a vácuo; Refrigeradores de água; Filtros de água; Adegas de vinho climatizadas; Máquinas de fazer iogurte